Utah statutes.
41-1a-1006.   Vehicle damaged out-of-state -- Division to make a record.

(1)  If a vehicle that is titled in this state is damaged in another state or jurisdiction but would require a salvage certificate in this state and the vehicle is not returned to the state, the owner of the vehicle must notify the purchaser and the division that if the vehicle is subsequently titled in Utah the certificate of title will be branded as a salvage vehicle.

(2)  The division shall make a record of the damage.

